Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.160

Organizing permit—Application.

The application for an organizing permit under RCW 33.48.150 shall be in writing, verified as provided by law for the verification of pleadings and shall be filed in the office of the director. Such application shall be signed by the proposed incorporators and shall include the following:

(1) The names and addresses of its proposed directors, officers and incorporators, to the extent known;

(2) The proposed location of its office;

(3) A copy of any contract proposed to be used for the solicitation of stock subscriptions and funds for its preincorporation expenses;

(4) A copy of any advertisement, circular, or other written matter proposed to be used for soliciting stock subscriptions and funds for its preincorporation expenses;

(5) A statement of the total funds proposed to be solicited and collected prior to incorporation and an itemized estimate of the preincorporation expenses proposed to be paid;

(6) A list of the names and addresses and amounts of each of the known proposed stockholders and contributors to the fund for preincorporation expenses; and

(7) Such additional information as the director may require.

[ 1994 c 92 s 482; 1973 c 130 s 7.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.

Definitions—1973 c 130: See RCW 33.24.350.